Utah statutes.
58-17b-401.   Grounds for denial of licensure -- Disciplinary proceedings.

Grounds for the following action regarding a license issued under this chapter shall be in accordance with Section 58-1-401:

(1)  refusal to issue a license to an applicant;

(2)  refusal to renew the license of a licensee;

(3)  to revoke, suspend, restrict, or place on probation the license of a licensee;

(4)  to issue a public or private reprimand to a licensee;

(5)  to issue cease and desist orders; and

(6)  to issue an administrative fine or citation.

